Utah statutes.
59-10-1316.   Contribution to Youth Development Organization Restricted Account.

(1)  Except as provided in Section 59-10-1304, for a taxable year beginning on or after January 1, 2013, a resident or nonresident individual who files an individual income tax return under this chapter may designate on the resident or nonresident individual's individual income tax return a contribution as provided in this section to be:

(a)  deposited into the Youth Development Organization Restricted Account created in Section 35A-8-1903; and

(b)  expended as provided in Title 35A, Chapter 8, Part 19, Youth Development Organization Restricted Account Act.

(2)  The commission shall:

(a)  determine the total amount of contributions designated in accordance with this section for a taxable year; and

(b)  credit the amount described in Subsection (2)(a) to the Youth Development Organization Restricted Account.



Enacted by Chapter 338, 2013 General Session

